Missouri, session 2026, HB2308.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 452, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 452.379, to read as follows:
452.379. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, a court may order
additional periods of parenting time to compensate a parent for the denial of court-
ordered parenting time.
2. Unless a party establishes good cause why an order under this subsection shall
not be issued, the court shall order additional parenting time to compensate for the
denial of court-ordered parenting time that resulted from an investigation by any
investigative agency including, but not limited to, the children's division within the
department of social services or any investigative agency, or a protective or restraining
order that did not result in a finding of abuse or neglect.
3. The additional parenting time:
(1) Shall be of the same type and duration as the parenting time that was denied;
(2) May include weekday, weekend, holiday, or vacation parenting time; and
(3) Shall be completed no later than two years after the date on which the court
determines the denial occurred.
4. The parent who was denied parenting time shall be entitled to select the times
and dates of the additional parenting time, consistent with subdivision (1) of subsection
3 of this section and subject to the best interests of the child.
5. Nothing in this section shall:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2308 2
(1) Create a cause of action against any investigative agency; or
(2) Waive sovereign immunity for any governmental entity or employee.
✔